District of Columbia statutes.
42-3404.36

Assignment of District rights.

The Mayor may assign the opportunity to purchase provided under this subchapter to a person that:

(1)

Demonstrates the capacity to own and manage, either by itself or through a management agent, the housing accommodation and related facilities for the remaining useful life of the housing accommodation; and

(2)

Agrees to obligate itself and any successors in interest to maintain the affordability of the assisted housing development as required by § 42-3404.33.

History

Sept. 10, 1980, D.C. Law 3-86, § 436
as added Dec. 24, 2008, D.C. Law 17-286, § 2, 55 DCR 11989

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3404.31.